Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF95.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RULEMAKING; WAKE SURFING ON MISSISSIPPI RIVER IN HENNEPIN AND ANOKA COUNTIES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of natural resources must adopt a new part in Minnesota Rules, chapter 6110, that conforms with this section. Minnesota Statutes, section 86B.205, subdivision 9, does not apply. The rule must apply only to the six-mile pool of the Mississippi River from the United States Highway 169 bridge in Champlin to the Coon Rapids Dam. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of the rule adopted under this section, "wake surf" means to: new text end new text begin (1) surf a wake, regardless of whether the surfer is being pulled by a tow rope attached to the watercraft that is producing the wake; or new text end new text begin (2) operate a boat that creates a wake that is, or is intended to be, surfed by another person. new text end new text begin (c) The rule must provide that: new text end new text begin (1) the operator of a watercraft must not deploy specially designed built-in ballast systems or use intentionally placed weight to create increased water displacement for wake surfing or any other purpose; new text end new text begin (2) the rule is not to be construed to prevent a local government from regulating wake surfing more than 450 feet from shore in accordance with Minnesota Rules, chapter 6110; and new text end new text begin (3) penalties are as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 86B.811. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may use the good cause exempt procedures under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, to adopt the rule under this section. Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply, except as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end